Florida, session 2026, HB5701.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (i) of subsection (13) of section
376.3071, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (g) of
subsection (15) is reenacted, to read:
376.3071 Inland Protection Trust Fund; creation; purposes;
funding.—
(13) PETROLEUM CLEANUP PARTICIPATION PROGRAM.—To encourage
detection, reporting, and cleanup of contamination caused by
discharges of petroleum or petroleum products, the department
shall, within the guidelines established in this subsection,
implement a cleanup program to provide rehabilitation funding
assistance for all property contaminated by discharges of
petroleum or petroleum products from a petroleum storage system
occurring before January 1, 1995. Eligibility is subject to an
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5701-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5701 2026
annual appropriation from the fund. Additionally, funding for
eligible sites is contingent upon annual appropriation in
subsequent years. Such continued state funding is not an
entitlement or a vested right under this subsection. Eligibility
shall be determined in the program, notwithstanding any other
provision of law, consent order, order, judgment, or ordinance
to the contrary.
(i) Notwithstanding this section, for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, program deductibles and copayments may not be assessed,
monetary caps may not be enforced, and all costs for activities
described in this subsection must be absorbed at the expense of
the Inland Protection Trust Fund, without recourse to
reimbursement or recovery, with the following exceptions:
1. This paragraph does not apply to a site where the
department has been denied site access to implement this
section.
2. This paragraph does not authorize or require
reimbursement from the fund for costs expended before the
beginning of the grace period.
3. Upon discovery by the department that the owner or
operator of a petroleum storage system has been grossly
negligent in the maintenance of such petroleum storage system;
has, with willful intent to conceal the existence of a serious
discharge, falsified inventory or reconciliation records
maintained with respect to the site at which such system is
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5701-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5701 2026
located; or has intentionally damaged such petroleum storage
system, the site at which such system is located is ineligible
for participation in the incentive program and the owner is
liable for all costs due to discharges from petroleum storage
systems at that site.

This paragraph expires July 1, 2026.
(15) ETHANOL OR BIODIESEL DAMAGE; PREVENTIVE MEASURES.—The
department shall pay, pursuant to this subsection, up to $10
million each fiscal year from the fund for the costs of labor
and equipment to repair or replace petroleum storage systems
that may have been damaged due to the storage of fuels blended
with ethanol or biodiesel, or for preventive measures to reduce
the potential for such damage.
(g) Payments may not be made for the following:
1. Proposal costs or costs related to preparation of the
application and required documentation;
2. Certified public accountant costs;
3. Except as provided in paragraph (j), any costs in
excess of the amount approved by the department under paragraph
(b) or which are not in substantial compliance with the purchase
order;
4. Costs associated with storage tanks, piping, or
ancillary equipment that has previously been repaired or
replaced for which costs have been paid under this section;
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5701-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5701 2026
5. Facilities that are not in compliance with department
storage tank rules, until the noncompliance issues have been
resolved; or
6. Costs associated with damage to petroleum storage
systems caused in whole or in part by causes other than the
storage of fuels blended with ethanol or biodiesel.
Section 2. Subsection (5) of section 376.3072, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
376.3072 Florida Petroleum Liability and Restoration
Insurance Program.—
(5) Notwithstanding subsections (1)-(4), for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, program deductibles or copayments may not be
assessed, monetary caps may not be enforced, and all costs for
activities described in this section must be absorbed at the
expense of the Inland Protection Trust Fund, without recourse to
reimbursement or recovery, with the following exceptions:
(a) This subsection does not apply to a site where the
department has been denied site access to implement this
section.
(b) This subsection does not authorize or require
reimbursement from the fund for costs expended before the
beginning of the grace period.
(c) Upon discovery by the department that the owner or
operator of a petroleum storage system has been grossly
100 negligent in the maintenance of such petroleum storage system;
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5701-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5701 2026
101 has, with willful intent to conceal the existence of a serious
102 discharge, falsified inventory or reconciliation records
103 maintained with respect to the site at which such system is
104 located; or has intentionally damaged such petroleum storage
105 system, the site at which such system is located is ineligible
106 for participation in the incentive program and the owner is
107 liable for all costs due to discharges from petroleum storage
108 systems at that site.
109
110 This subsection expires July 1, 2026.
111 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5701-00